Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑327] Hawaii home
visiting program; established. (a) There is established within the
department of health the Hawaii home visiting program, which shall be
responsible for statewide hospital-based screening and home visiting services
to identify families of newborns at risk for poor health and safety outcomes,
including child abuse and neglect, to promote healthy child development and
strengthen families.

(b) Within the limits of available funds, the
hospital-based screening and home visiting services program shall:

(1) Provide proactive, universal screening of
newborns' families, using one or more screening tools validated for identifying
levels of risk for poor health and safety outcomes and child abuse and neglect
as designated by the department of health;

(2) Refer high-risk families to Hawaii home visiting
program providers who shall employ evidence-based models of service; and

(3) Consider as a high priority, families at risk for
poor health outcomes, child abuse, or neglect. [L 2013, c 91, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next